Washington statutes.
RCW 36.115.080

Duties, requirements, authorities under growth management act not altered.

Nothing contained in this chapter alters the duties, requirements, and authorities of cities and counties contained in chapter 36.70A RCW.

[ 1994 c 266 s 8.]